Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.220

Action on bond for fraud.

Any consignor of an agricultural product claiming to be injured by the fraud of any commission merchant and/or dealer or their agents may bring action upon said bond against principal, surety, and agent in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages caused by such fraud. Any consignor undertaking such an action shall name the director as a party.

[ 1986 c 178 s 10; 1982 c 194 s 4; 1959 c 139 s 22.]